Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2942
Department; animal disease control and eradication responsibilities; cooperate and contract; agreements authorized.

In carrying out its animal disease control and eradication responsibilities, the department may cooperate and contract with public or private persons and enter into agreements with other state or federal agencies to allow personnel from such agencies to work in Nebraska and to allow department personnel to work in other states or with federal agencies under a cooperative work program.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 42.